Nevada, session 83, AB305.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 629 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A provider of health care shall not charge a person more
than $30 to fill out a form for a certification required by an
employer pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 2613.
2. The amount specified in subsection 1 must be increased or
decreased annually in an amount corresponding to the percentage
of increase or decrease in the Consumer Price Index (All Items)
published by the United States Department of Labor for the
immediately preceding year. On or before January 1 of each year,
the Department of Health and Human Services shall determine
the amount of the increase or decrease required by this subsection
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
and establish the adjusted amount to take effect on January 1 of
that year. The Department shall also post the adjusted amount on
its Internet website.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)